Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201077-2701.38
Streamlined
sales and use tax agreement, defined.

Streamlined
sales and use tax agreement means the streamlined sales and use tax agreement
approved by the implementing states on November 12, 2002, including amendments ratified by the Legislature pursuant
to section 77-2712.03.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 42;

Laws 2010, LB879, § 8.
October 1, 2010